Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Article 3. Rule-Making Adoption and Effectiveness of Rules.

§ 25-43-3.101.
Advice on possible rules before notice of proposed rule adoption.

In addition to seeking information by other methods, an agency, before filing of a notice of proposed rule adoption under Section 25-43-3.103, may solicit comments from the public on a subject matter of possible rule-making under active consideration within the agency by causing notice to be filed with the Secretary of State for publication in the administrative bulletin of the subject matter and indicating where, when and how persons may comment.

Each agency may also appoint committees of nonagency personnel or other members of the public to comment, before filing of a notice of proposed rule adoption under Section 25-43-3.103, on the subject matter of a possible rule-making under active consideration within the agency. The membership of those committees must be filed with the Secretary of State for publication in the administrative bulletin.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 25-43-3.102.
Public rule-making docket.

Each agency shall maintain a current, public rule-making docket.

The rule-making docket may, but need not, contain a listing of the subject matter of possible rules currently under active consideration within the agency for proposal under Section 25-43-3.103 and the name and address of agency personnel with whom persons may communicate with respect to the matter.

The rule-making docket must list each pending rule-making proceeding. A rule-making proceeding is pending from the time it is commenced, by proper filing with the Secretary of State of a notice of proposed rule adoption, to the time it is terminated by the filing with the Secretary of State of a notice of termination or the rule becoming effective. For each pending rule-making proceeding, the docket must indicate:

The subject matter of the proposed rule;

A citation to all published notices relating to the proceeding;

Where written submissions or written requests for an opportunity to make oral presentations on the proposed rule may be inspected;

The time during which written submissions may be made;

If applicable, where and when oral presentations may be made;

Where any economic impact statement and written requests for the issuance of and other information concerning an economic impact statement of the proposed rule may be inspected;

The current status of the proposed rule;

The date of the rule’s adoption; and

When the rule will become effective.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 25-43-3.103.
Notice of proposed rule adoption.

At least twenty-five (25) days before the adoption of a rule an agency shall cause notice of its contemplated action to be properly filed with the Secretary of State for publication in the administrative bulletin. The notice of proposed rule adoption must include:

A short explanation of the purpose of the proposed rule and the agency’s reasons for proposing the rule;

The specific legal authority authorizing the promulgation of rules;

A reference to all rules repealed, amended or suspended by the proposed rule;

Subject to Section 25-43-2.101(5), the text of the proposed rule;

Where, when and how persons may present their views on the proposed rule; and

Where, when and how persons may demand an oral proceeding on the proposed rule if the notice does not already provide for one.

Within three (3) days after its proper filing with the Secretary of State for publication in the administrative bulletin, the agency shall cause a copy of the notice of proposed rule adoption to be provided to each person who has made a timely request to the agency to be placed on the mailing list maintained by the agency of persons who have requested notices of proposed rule adoptions. An agency may mail the copy to the person and may charge the person a reasonable fee for such service, which fee may be in excess of the actual cost of providing the person with a mailed copy. Alternatively, the agency may provide the copy via the Internet or by transmitting it to the person by electronic means, including, but not limited to, facsimile transfer or e-mail at no charge to the person, if the person consents to this form of delivery.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 25-43-3.104.
Public participation.

For at least twenty-five (25) days after proper filing with the Secretary of State of the notice of proposed rule adoption, an agency shall afford persons the opportunity to submit, in writing, argument, data and views on the proposed rule.

An agency, in its discretion, may schedule an oral proceeding on any proposed rule. However, an agency shall schedule an oral proceeding on a proposed rule if, within twenty (20) days after the proper filing of the notice of proposed rule adoption, a written request for an oral proceeding is submitted by a political subdivision, an agency or ten (10) persons. At that proceeding, persons may present oral or written argument, data and views on the proposed rule.

An oral proceeding on a proposed rule, if required, may not be held earlier than twenty (20) days after notice of its location and time is properly filed with the Secretary of State for publication in the administrative bulletin. Within three (3) days after its proper filing with the Secretary of State for publication in the administrative bulletin, the agency shall cause a copy of the notice of the location and time of the oral proceeding to be mailed to each person who has made a timely request to the agency to be placed on the mailing list maintained by the agency of persons who have requested notices of proposed rule adoptions.

The agency, a member of the agency, or another presiding officer designated by the agency shall preside at a required oral proceeding on a proposed rule. Oral proceedings must be open to the public and may be recorded by stenographic or other means.

An agency may issue rules for the conduct of oral rule-making proceedings or prepare reasonable guidelines or procedures for the conduct of any such proceedings. Those rules may include, but not be limited to, provisions calculated to prevent undue repetition in the oral proceedings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 25-43-3.105.
Economic impact statement, requirement and conditions.

Prior to giving the notice required in Section 25-43-3.103, each agency proposing the adoption of a rule or significant amendment of an existing rule imposing a duty, responsibility or requirement on any person shall consider the economic impact the rule will have on the citizens of our state and the benefits the rule will cause to accrue to those citizens. For purposes of this section, a “significant amendment” means any amendment to a rule for which the total aggregate cost to all persons required to comply with that rule exceeds One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00).

Each agency shall prepare a written report providing an economic impact statement for the adoption of a rule or significant amendment to an existing rule imposing a duty, responsibility or requirement on any person, except as provided in subsection (7) of this section. The economic impact statement shall include the following:

A description of the need for and the benefits which will likely accrue as the result of the proposed action;

An estimate of the cost to the agency, and to any other state or local government entities, of implementing and enforcing the proposed action, including the estimated amount of paperwork, and any anticipated effect on state or local revenues;

An estimate of the cost or economic benefit to all persons directly affected by the proposed action;

An analysis of the impact of the proposed rule on small business;

A comparison of the costs and benefits of the proposed rule to the probable costs and benefits of not adopting the proposed rule or significantly amending an existing rule;

A determination of whether less costly methods or less intrusive methods exist for achieving the purpose of the proposed rule where reasonable alternative methods exist which are not precluded by law;

A description of reasonable alternative methods, where applicable, for achieving the purpose of the proposed action which were considered by the agency and a statement of reasons for rejecting those alternatives in favor of the proposed rule; and

A detailed statement of the data and methodology used in making estimates required by this subsection.

No rule or regulation shall be declared invalid based on a challenge to the economic impact statement for the rule unless the issue is raised in the agency proceeding. No person shall have standing to challenge a rule, based upon the economic impact statement or lack thereof, unless that person provided the agency with information sufficient to make the agency aware of specific concerns regarding the statement in an oral proceeding or in written comments regarding the rule. The grounds for invalidation of an agency action, based upon the economic impact statement, are limited to the agency’s failure to adhere to the procedure for preparation of the economic impact statement as provided in this section, or the agency’s failure to consider information submitted to the agency regarding specific concerns about the statement, if that failure substantially impairs the fairness of the rule-making proceeding.

A concise summary of the economic impact statement must be properly filed with the Secretary of State for publication in the administrative bulletin and the period during which persons may make written submissions on the proposed rule shall not expire until at least twenty (20) days after the date of such proper filing.

The properly filed summary of the economic impact statement must also indicate where persons may obtain copies of the full text of the economic impact statement and where, when and how persons may present their views on the proposed rule and demand an oral proceeding on the proposed rule if one is not already provided.

If the agency has made a good-faith effort to comply with the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the rule may not be invalidated on the ground that the contents of the economic impact statement are insufficient or inaccurate.

This section does not apply to the adoption of:

Any rule which is required by the federal government pursuant to a state/federal program delegation agreement or contract;

Any rule which is expressly required by state law; and

A temporary rule adopted pursuant to Section 25-43-3.108.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 16; Laws, 2012, ch. 454, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 25-43-3.106.
Time and manner of rule adoption.

An agency may not adopt a rule until the period for making written submissions and oral presentations has expired.

Following the proper filing with the Secretary of State of the notice of proposed rule adoption, an agency shall adopt a rule pursuant to the rule-making proceeding or terminate the proceeding by proper filing with the Secretary of State of a notice to that effect for publication in the administrative bulletin.

Before the adoption of a rule, an agency shall consider the written submissions, oral submissions or any memorandum summarizing oral submissions, and any economic impact statement, provided for by this Article III.

Within the scope of its delegated authority, an agency may use its own experience, technical competence, specialized knowledge and judgment in the adoption of a rule.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 25-43-3.107.
Variance between adopted rule and published notice of proposed rule adoption.

An agency shall not adopt a rule that differs from the rule proposed in the notice of proposed rule adoption on which the rule is based unless all of the following apply:

The differences are within the scope of the matter announced in the notice of proposed rule adoption and are in character with the issues raised in that notice;

The differences are a logical outgrowth of the contents of that notice of proposed rule adoption and the comments submitted in response thereto; and

The notice of proposed rule adoption provided fair warning that the outcome of that rule-making proceeding could be the rule in question.

In determining whether the notice of proposed rule adoption provided fair warning that the outcome of that rule-making proceeding could be the rule in question, an agency shall consider all of the following factors:

The extent to which persons who will be affected by the rule should have understood that the rule-making proceeding on which it is based could affect their interests;

The extent to which the subject matter of the rule or issues determined by the rule are different from the subject matter or issues contained in the notice of proposed rule adoption; and

The extent to which the effects of the rule differ from the effects of the proposed rule contained in the notice of proposed rule adoption.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 25-43-3.108.
Exemption from public rule-making procedures for temporary rules.

If an agency finds that an imminent peril to the public health, safety or welfare requires adoption of a rule upon fewer than twenty-five (25) days’ notice and states in writing its reasons for that finding, it may proceed without prior notice of hearing or upon any abbreviated notice and hearing that it finds practicable to adopt an emergency rule. The rule may be effective for a period of not longer than one hundred twenty (120) days, renewable once for a period not exceeding ninety (90) days, but the adoption of an identical rule under subsection (1) of this section is not precluded.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 25-43-3.109.
Contents, style and form of rule.

Each rule adopted by an agency must contain the text of the rule and:

The date the agency adopted the rule;

An indication of any change between the text of the proposed rule contained in the published notice of proposed rule adoption and the text of the rule as finally adopted, with the reasons for any substantive change;

Any changes to the information contained in the notice of proposed rule adoption as required by subsection (1)(a), (b) or (c) of Section 25-43-3.103;

Any findings required by any provision of law as a prerequisite to adoption or effectiveness of the rule; and

The effective date of the rule if other than that specified in Section 25-43-3.113(1).

To the extent feasible, each rule should be written in clear and concise language understandable to persons who may be affected by it.

An agency may incorporate, by reference in its rules and without publishing the incorporated matter in full, all or any part of a code, standard, rule or regulation that has been adopted by an agency of the United States or of this state, another state or by a nationally recognized organization or association, if incorporation of its text in agency rules would be unduly cumbersome, expensive or otherwise inexpedient. The reference in the agency rules must fully identify the incorporated matter with an appropriate citation. An agency may incorporate by reference such matter in its rules only if the agency, organization or association originally issuing that matter makes copies of it readily available to the public. The rules must state if copies of the incorporated matter are available from the agency issuing the rule or where copies of the incorporated matter are available from the agency of the United States, this state, another state or the organization or association originally issuing that matter.

In preparing its rules pursuant to this Article III, each agency shall follow the uniform numbering system, form and style prescribed by the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 25-43-3.110.
Agency rule-making record.

An agency shall maintain an official rule-making record for each rule it (a) proposes or (b) adopts. The agency has the exclusive authority to prepare and exclusive authority to certify the record or any part thereof, including, but not limited to, any transcript of the proceedings, and the agency’s certificate shall be accepted by the court and by any other agency. The record must be available for public inspection.

The agency rule-making record must contain:

Copies of all notices of proposed rule-making or oral proceedings or other publications in the administrative bulletin with respect to the rule or the proceeding upon which the rule is based;

Copies of any portions of the agency’s public rule-making docket containing entries relating to the rule or the proceeding upon which the rule is based;

All written requests, submissions and comments received by the agency and all other written materials considered by the agency in connection with the formulation, proposal or adoption of the rule or the proceeding upon which the rule is based;

Any official transcript of oral presentations made in the proceeding upon which the rule is based or, if not transcribed, any tape recording or stenographic record of those presentations, and any memorandum prepared by a presiding official summarizing the contents of those presentations. The word “transcript” includes a written transcript, a printed transcript, an audible audiotape or videotape that is indexed and annotated so that it is readily accessible and any other means that the agency may have by rule provided for the reliable and accessible preservation of the proceeding;

A copy of any economic impact statement prepared for the proceeding upon which the rule is based; and

A copy of the rule and related information set out in Section 25-43-3.109 as filed in the Office of the Secretary of State.

The agency shall have authority to engage such persons and acquire such equipment as may be reasonably necessary to record and preserve in any technically and practicably feasible manner all matters and all proceedings had at any rule-making proceeding.

Upon judicial review, the record required by this section constitutes the official agency rule-making record with respect to a rule. Except as otherwise required by a provision of law, the agency rule-making record need not constitute the exclusive basis for agency action on that rule or for judicial review thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 25-43-3.111.
Invalidity of rules not adopted according to article; time limitation.

A rule adopted after July 1, 2005, is invalid unless adopted in substantial compliance with the provisions of Sections 25-43-3.102 through 25-43-3.110. Inadvertent failure to mail a notice of proposed rule adoption to any person as required by Section 25-43-3.103(2) does not invalidate a rule.

An action to contest the validity of a rule on the grounds of its noncompliance with any provision of Sections 25-43-3.102 through 25-43-3.110 must be commenced within one (1) year after the effective date of the rule.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 25-43-3.112.
Filing of rules.

An agency shall file in the Office of the Secretary of State each rule it adopts and all rules existing on July 1, 2005, that have not previously been filed. The filing must be done as soon after adoption of the rule as is practicable. At the time of filing, each rule adopted after July 1, 2005, must have included in or attached to it the material set out in Section 25-43-3.109. The Secretary of State shall affix to each rule and statement a certification of the date of filing and keep a permanent register open to public inspection of all filed rules and attached material. In filing a rule, each agency shall use a standard format prescribed by the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 25-43-3.113.
Effective date of rules.

Except to the extent subsection (2) or (3) of this section provides otherwise, each rule adopted after July 1, 2005, becomes effective thirty (30) days after its proper filing in the Office of the Secretary of State.

A rule becomes effective on a date later than that established by subsection (1) of this section if a later date is required by another statute or specified in the rule.

A rule may become effective immediately upon its filing or on any subsequent date earlier than that established by subsection (1) of this section if the agency establishes such an effective date and finds that:

It is required by Constitution, statute or court order;

The rule only confers a benefit or removes a restriction on the public or some segment thereof;

The rule only delays the effective date of another rule that is not yet effective; or

The earlier effective date is necessary because of imminent peril to the public health, safety or welfare.

The finding and a brief statement of the reasons therefor required by paragraph (b) of this subsection must be made a part of the rule. In any action contesting the effective date of a rule made effective under paragraph (b) of this subsection, the burden is on the agency to justify its finding.

A temporary rule may become effective immediately upon its filing or on any subsequent date earlier than that established by subsection (1) of this section.

Each agency shall make a reasonable effort to make known to persons who may be affected by it a rule made effective before any date established by subsection (1) of this section.

This section does not relieve an agency from compliance with any provision of law requiring that some or all of its rules be approved by other designated officials or bodies before they become effective.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 2005.